nursery/apertium-eng-afr/apertium-eng-afr.afr.dix
    <pardef n="van_der_Merwe__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Amnesty_International__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Engeland__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Pronomen -->

    <pardef n="die_ander__prn">
     <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e r="RL">
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="altwee__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="elkeen__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ek</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>jy</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hy</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>sy</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>dit</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ons</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>julle</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>hulle</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="probj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hom</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>haar</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dit</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>julle</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hulle</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mens</l>
          <r>mens<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verb pre/infixes -->

    <pardef n="P__ge">
      <e lm="ge">
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>ge<s n="pref"/><s n="past"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- attachables -->
    <pardef n="P__pr">
      <e lm="seer" r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>seer</l>
          <r>seer<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="agterna" r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>agterna</l>
          <r>agterna<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="terug" r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>terug</l>
          <r>terug<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="uit" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>uit</l>
          <r>uit<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="aan" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aan</l>
          <r>aan<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="teë" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>teë</l>
          <r>teë<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="weg" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>weg</l>
          <r>weg<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="af" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>af</l>
          <r>af<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="ver" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ver</l>
          <r>ver<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="op" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>op</l>
          <r>op<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="om" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>om<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="voor" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>voor</l>
          <r>voor<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="oor" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oor</l>
          <r>oor<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="deur" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>deur</l>
          <r>deur<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="neer" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>neer</l>
          <r>neer<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="toe" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>toe</l>
          <r>toe<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="raak" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>raak</l>
          <r>raak<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="saam" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>saam</l>
          <r>saam<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="onder" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>onder</l>
          <r>onder<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="in" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="vry" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>vry</l>
          <r>vry<s n="pr"/><s n="atp"/><j/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verben -->
    <pardef n="h/ê__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ê<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte"><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dit"><i>dit</i><par n="die_ander__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="die ander"><i>die<b/>ander</i><par n="die_ander__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="een ander"><i>een<b/>ander</i><par n="die_ander__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="alle"><i>alle</i><par n="die_ander__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="niemand"><i>niemand</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="enigiemand"><i>enigiemand</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="almal"><i>almal</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="niks"><i>niks</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="iemand"><i>iemand</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="enigiets"><i>enigiets</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="daardie"><i>daardie</i><par n="altwee__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="altwee"><i>altwee</i><par n="altwee__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mekaar"><i>mekaar</i><par n="altwee__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="'n ander" r="LR"><i>'n<b/>ander</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ŉ ander" r="LR"><i>ŉ<b/>ander</i><par n="elkeen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Smith"><i>Smith</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hitler"><i>Hitler</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dalí"><i>Dalí</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Botha"><i>Botha</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stalin"><i>Staln</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fischer"><i>Fischer</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Helsinki"><i>Helsinki</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kroasië"><i>Kroasië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kenia"><i>Kenia</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Saoedi-Arabië"><i>Saoedi-Arabië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Transvaal"><i>Transvaal</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Slowenië"><i>Slowenië</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Atlantiese Oseaan"><i>Atlantiese<b/>Oseaan</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stille oseaan"><i>Stille<b/>oseaan</i><par n="Engeland__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wikipedia"><i>Wikipedia</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Departement van Arbeid"><i>Departement<b/>van<b/>Arbeid</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Departement van Binnelandse Sake"><i>Departement<b/>van<b/>Binnelandse<b/>Sake</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Departement van Grondsake"><i>Departement<b/>van<b/>Grondsake</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Departement van Kommunikasie"><i>Departement<b/>van<b/>Kommunikasie</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Departement van Minerale en Energie"><i>Departement<b/>van<b/>Minerale<b/>en<b/>Energie</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Departement van Plaaslike Bestuur"><i>Departement<b/>van<b/>Plaaslike<b/>Bestuur</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="hê"><par n="P__ge"/><i>h</i><par n="h/ê__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bly"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>bly</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kry"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>kry</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gooi"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>gooi</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meld"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>meld</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vaardig"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>vaardig</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="toon"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>toon</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pak"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>pak</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stry"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>stry</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dui"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>dui</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="heg"><par n="P__pr"/><par n="P__ge"/><i>heg</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="snik"><par n="P__ge"/><i>snik</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stop"><par n="P__ge"/><i>stop</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hoor"><par n="P__ge"/><i>hoor</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meet"><par n="P__ge"/><i>meet</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aandui"><par n="P__ge"/><i>aandui</i><par n="breek__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Peter"><i>Peter</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="IAWK"><i>IAWK</i><par n="Amnesty_International__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Javascript"><i>Javascript</i><par n="van_der_Merwe__np"/></e>
